District of Columbia statutes.
34-1255.06

Cable operator as trustee.

After termination or revocation of a franchise, and until such time as the cable operator transfers its cable system to the District or to another person pursuant to this chapter or until such other time as established by the Council, the cable operator shall be a trustee in interest for the District or its successor, and shall continue to operate the cable system under the terms and conditions of this chapter, the franchise, and the franchise agreement. During the trustee period, the cable operator shall not sell any of the cable system assets nor shall the cable operator make any physical, material, administrative, or operational change that would tend to degrade the quality of service to subscribers, decrease income, or materially increase expenses, without the express written permission of the District. The District may seek legal and equitable relief to enforce the provisions of this subsection.

History

Aug. 21, 1982, D.C. Law 4-142, § 506
as added Oct. 9, 2002, D.C. Law 14-193, § 2(b), 49 DCR 7334